Massachusetts, session 194th, H4029.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
No colored glass, colored plastic, bracket, holder, mounting, frame or any other type of
covering shall be placed, mounted or installed on, around or over any number plate if such glass,
plastic, bracket, holder, mounting, frame or other type of covering in any way alters or obscures
(i) the number plate; (ii) the color of the number plate; (iii) the name or abbreviated name of the
state wherein the vehicle is registered; or (iv) any character or characters, decal, stamp or other
device indicating the month or year in which the vehicle's registration expires.
of 1